Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202286-1406
Rules and regulations.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Precision Agriculture Infrastructure Grant Act.

Laws 2022, LB1144, § 17.
July 21, 2022